Utah statutes.
59-27-106.   Records.

(1)  An owner or operator of a sexually explicit business or escort service shall maintain records, statements, books, or accounts necessary to determine the amount of tax for which the owner or operator is liable to pay under this chapter.

(2)  The commission may require an owner or operator of a sexually explicit business or escort service, by notice served on the person, to make or keep the records, statements, books, or accounts described in Subsection (1) in a manner in which the commission considers sufficient to show the amount of tax for which the owner or operator is liable to pay under this chapter.

(3)  After notice by the commission, the owner or operator of a sexually explicit business or escort service shall open the records, statements, books, or accounts specified in this section for examination by the commission or an authorized agent of the commission.

